District of Columbia statutes.
34-913

Separate hearings on complaints; complaints not to be dismissed because of absence of direct damage.

The Commission may, in its discretion, when complaint is made of more than one rate or charge of any public utility, order separate hearings thereon, and may consider and determine the several matters complained of separately and at such times as it may prescribe. No complaint shall of necessity at any time be dismissed because of the absence of direct damage to the complainant.

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 984, ch. 150, § 8, par. 43
May 9, 2000, D.C. Law 13-107, § 201(h), 47 DCR 1091
1981 Ed., § 43-614.
1973 Ed., § 43-413.
D.C. Law 13-107 substituted “rate or charge of any public utility” for “rate or charge”.